Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1320
Claim; appeal; procedure.

Any person aggrieved by a decision of the State Treasurer or as to whose claim the State Treasurer has failed to act within ninety days after the filing of the claim may appeal, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 20, p. 2489;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 110.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.